Hawaii statutes.
§576D-5 Fee for obtaining or enforcing
nonpublic assistance order. (a) The agency shall require the payment of a
reasonable fee on the application of a person under section 576D-3(b)(3) who is
not receiving public assistance for support of the child for assistance in
obtaining or enforcing a child support order. The payment and amount of the
fee shall be in compliance with applicable federal regulations promulgated
under Title IV-D.

(b) In the case of an individual who has never
received public assistance for the support of a child under Title IV-A and for
whom the State has collected not less than $500 of support, the agency shall
impose an annual fee of $25 for each case in which Title IV-D services were
furnished, which shall be retained in accordance with Title IV-D requirements;
provided that the $25 shall not be retained from the first $500 so collected.
Any fee collected shall be maintained by the agency and used as required under
Title IV-D. [L 1986, c 332, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 167, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next